Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201768-991
Medical provider; authority to apply for medical assistance.

A medical provider shall have the authority of a guardian and conservator for the limited purpose of making application for medical assistance on behalf of a person whom the provider is treating if the person is unconscious or otherwise is unable to apply for medical assistance and does not have an existing power of attorney or a court-appointed individual to apply on the person’s behalf.

Laws 2017, LB268, § 13.
August 24, 2017